Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-17,108
Act, how cited.

Sections 71-17,108 to 71-17,114 shall be known and may be cited as the Nursing Faculty Student Loan Act.

Laws 2005, LB 146, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 157.
July 1, 2026
Nurse Practice Act, see section 38-2201.